District of Columbia statutes.
22-1512

Prosecution under § 22-1511.

Prosecution under § 22-1511 shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia upon information filed by the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia or an Assistant U.S. Attorney.

May 29, 1916, 39 Stat. 165, ch. 130, § 2
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 909, ch. 646, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 10, 41 DCR 1639
1981 Ed., § 22-1412.
1973 Ed., § 22-1412.